District of Columbia statutes.
8-1778.30

Clarification regarding the debt cap.

For purposes of calculating the District’s level of debt, the Special Assessments do not constitute revenues derived from taxes, fees, or other general revenues of the District, or its agencies or authorities, pursuant to the District’s power to tax or impose fees within the definition of District Bonds in § 47-334(2).

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-183, § 210, 57 DCR 3406
Section 111 of D.C. Law 18-156 added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 111. Clarification regarding the debt cap. The voluntary Special Assessments do not constitute revenues derived from taxes, fees, or other general revenues of the District, or its agencies or authorities, pursuant to the District’s power to tax or impose fees within the definition of District Bonds in D.C. Official Code § 47-334(2).”
Section 402(b) of D.C. Law 18-156 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 111 of Energy Efficiency Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-324, March 1, 2010, 57 DCR 1851).